Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5727
Recapture or disallowance of incentives.

(1)(a) If the taxpayer fails either to meet the required levels of employment or investment for the applicable project within the time period prescribed in subsection (4) of section 77-5723 or to utilize such project in a qualified business at employment and investment levels at or above those required in the agreement for the entire entitlement period, all or a portion of the incentives set forth in the Nebraska Advantage Act shall be recaptured or disallowed.

(b) In the case of a taxpayer who has failed to meet the required levels of investment or employment within the required time period, all reduction in the personal property tax because of the act shall be recaptured.

(2) In the case of a taxpayer who has failed to maintain the project at the required levels of employment or investment for the entire entitlement period, any reduction in the personal property tax, any refunds in tax or exemptions from tax allowed under subsection (2) of section 77-5725, and any refunds or reduction in tax allowed because of the use of a credit allowed under section 77-5725 shall be partially recaptured from either the taxpayer or the owner of the improvement to real estate and any carryovers of credits shall be partially disallowed. The amount of the recapture shall be a percentage equal to the number of years the taxpayer did not maintain the project at or above the required levels of investment and employment divided by the number of years of the project's entitlement period multiplied by the refunds and exemptions allowed, reduction in personal property tax, the credits used, and the remaining carryovers. In addition, the last remaining year of personal property tax exemption shall be disallowed for each year the taxpayer did not maintain such project at or above the required levels of employment or investment.

(3) In the case of a taxpayer qualified under tier 5 who has failed to maintain the average number of equivalent employees at the project at the end of the six years following the year the taxpayer attained the required amount of investment, any refunds or exemptions in tax allowed under subsection (2) of section 77-5725 or any reduction in the personal property tax under section 77-5725 shall be partially recaptured from the taxpayer. The amount of recapture shall be the total amount of refunds, exemptions, and reductions in tax allowed for all years times the reduction in the average number of equivalent employees employed at the end of the entitlement period from the number of equivalent employees employed in the base year divided by the number of equivalent employees employed in the base year. For purposes of this subsection, the average number of equivalent employees shall be calculated at the end of the entitlement period by adding the number of equivalent employees in the year the taxpayer attains the required level of investment and each of the next following six years and dividing the result by seven.

(4) If the taxpayer receives any refund, exemption, or reduction in tax to which the taxpayer was not entitled or which was in excess of the amount to which the taxpayer was entitled, the refund, exemption, or reduction in tax shall be recaptured separate from any other recapture otherwise required by this section. Any amount recaptured under this subsection shall be excluded from the amounts subject to recapture under other subsections of this section.

(5) Any refund, exemption, or reduction in tax due, to the extent required to be recaptured, shall be deemed to be an underpayment of the tax and shall be immediately due and payable. When tax benefits were received in more than one year, the tax benefits received in the most recent year shall be recovered first and then the benefits received in earlier years up to the extent of the required recapture.

(6)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (6)(b) of this section, any personal property tax that would have been due except for the exemption allowed under the Nebraska Advantage Act, to the extent it becomes due under this section, shall be considered delinquent and shall be immediately due and payable to the county or counties in which the property was located when exempted.

(b) For a tier 2 large data center project, any personal property tax that would have been due except for the exemption under the Nebraska Advantage Act, together with interest at the rate provided in section 45-104.01 from the original delinquency date of the tax that would have been due until the date paid, to the extent it becomes due under this section, shall be considered delinquent and shall be immediately payable to the county or counties in which the property was located when exempted.

(c) All amounts received by a county under this section shall be allocated to each taxing unit levying taxes on tangible personal property in the county in the same proportion that the levy on tangible personal property of such taxing unit bears to the total levy of all of such taxing units.

(7) Notwithstanding any other limitations contained in the laws of this state, collection of any taxes deemed to be underpayments by this section shall be allowed for a period of three years after the end of the entitlement period.

(8) Any amounts due under this section shall be recaptured notwithstanding other allowable credits and shall not be subsequently refunded under any provision of the Nebraska Advantage Act unless the recapture was in error.

(9) The recapture required by this section shall not occur if the failure to maintain the required levels of employment or investment was caused by an act of God or national emergency.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 49;

Laws 2006, LB 1003, § 15;

Laws 2008, LB895, § 18;

Laws 2009, LB164, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB1118, § 9;

Laws 2022, LB1150, § 11;

Laws 2024, LB1088, § 2.